Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.120

Adoption of rules.

The office shall have authority to adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 103; 1985 c 370 s 8. Formerly RCW 28B.80.370.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.